Utah statutes.
11-25-2.   Legislative findings -- Liberal construction.

The legislature finds and declares that it is necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants that community development and renewal agencies be authorized within cities, towns or counties, or cities or towns and counties to make long-term, low-interest loans to finance residential rehabilitation in selected residential areas in order to encourage the upgrading of property in those areas.  Unless such agencies provide some form of assistance to finance residential rehabilitation, many residential areas will deteriorate at an accelerated pace.  This act shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.



Amended by Chapter 359, 2006 General Session

